Utah statutes.
63G-4-104.   Bases for certain recommendations and decisions limited.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), no agency may recommend or rule on the custody, placement, including foster placement, or other disposition alternative for a minor, or the termination of parental rights, based on the fact that a parent or guardian of the minor lawfully does one or more of the following:

(a)  legally possesses or uses a firearm or other weapon;

(b)  espouses particular religious beliefs; or

(c)  schools the minor or other minors outside the public education system or is otherwise sympathetic to schooling a minor outside the public education system.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not prohibit a recommendation or ruling based on the compatibility of a minor with a particular custody, placement, or other disposition alternative as determined by the presence of any of the factors in Subsections (1)(a) through (1)(c).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

